Utah statutes.
11-44-203.   Length of agreements.

A political subdivision may only enter into an energy savings agreement for more than one year if the political subdivision finds that the amount the political subdivision would spend on the energy efficiency measure will not exceed the amount of the cost savings over 20 years from the date of installation of the energy efficiency measure.

